Maryland, session 2025, SB0097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE YOUTH ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM.
(3) “TARGETED INDIVIDUALS” MEANS EARLY ADOLESCENT
CHILDREN AND YOUNG ADULTS WHO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0097*

SENATE BILL 97
(I) RESIDE IN OR ATTEND ANY PUBLIC SCHOOL IN BALTIMORE
CITY OR BALTIMORE COUNTY;
(II) AT THE TIME OF FIRST RECEIVING SERVICES FROM A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
QUALIFY FOR FREE OR REDUCED PRICE MEALS; AND
(III) ARE MEMBERS OF A HISTORICALLY DISADVANTAGED
GROUP WHO FACE OBSTACLES TO ACHIEVEMENT THAT MAY BE EFFECTIVELY
MITIGATED BY LONG–TERM MENTORSHIP.
(B) THERE IS A YOUTH ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS THAT:
(1) ARE HEADQUARTERED IN A CENTRAL LOCATION IN BALTIMORE
CITY; AND
(2) PROVIDE SERVICES TO TARGETED INDIVIDUALS THAT
SPECIFICALLY ADDRESS AND ADAPT TO THE NEEDS OF TARGETED INDIVIDUALS
FROM EARLY ADOLESCENCE TO ADULTHOOD WITH A FOCUS ON MENTORING AND
ACADEMIC AND SOCIAL INSTRUCTION THAT INCLUDES CONTINUOUS ENGAGEMENT
INTO ADULTHOOD IN:
(I) LIFELONG HEALTH AND WELLNESS, INCLUDING
ATHLETICS, EXERCISE, AND NUTRITION;
(II) MENTAL HEALTH;
(III) CHARACTER DEVELOPMENT; AND
(IV) COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS.
(D) THE SERVICES PROVIDED TO TARGETED INDIVIDUALS BY NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS THAT RECEIVE GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE:
(1) PROVIDED DURING OUT–OF–SCHOOL TIME AND OUT–OF–WORK
TIME; AND
(2) DELIVERED PARTLY BY INDIVIDUALS WHO PREVIOUSLY
RECEIVED SERVICES FROM THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.

SENATE BILL 97 3
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) ESTABLISH APPLICATION PROCEDURES FOR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS TO APPLY TO THE PROGRAM.
(F) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$1,000,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 FOLLOWING EACH FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION RECEIVED A GRANT FROM THE PROGRAM, THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT:
(1) PROVIDES DATA ON THE SERVICES PROVIDED TO TARGETED
INDIVIDUALS; AND
(2) TRACKS STUDENT PROGRESS THROUGH THE EDUCATION SYSTEM.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
THAT SUMMARIZES THE REPORTS RECEIVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REPORT SUBMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE
INFORMATION ON THE GRANTS DISTRIBUTED EACH FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.